Washington statutes.
RCW 9.02.902

Short title—1992 c 1 (Initiative Measure No. 120).

RCW 9.02.100 through 9.02.170 and 9.02.900 through 9.02.902 shall be known and may be cited as the Reproductive Privacy Act.

[ 1992 c 1 s 12 (Initiative Measure No. 120, approved November 5, 1991).]